North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 5. Farming Out Convicts.

§ 148-66.
Cities and towns and Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may contract for prison labor. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The corporate authorities of any city or town may contract in writing with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for the employment of convicts upon the highways or streets of such city or town, and such contracts when so exercised shall be valid and enforceable against such city or town, and the Attorney General may prosecute an action in the Superior Court of Wake County in the name of the State for their enforcement.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is hereby authorized and empowered to contract, in writing, with the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for the employment and use of convicts under its supervision to be worked on the State test farms and/or State experimental stations.

History.

1881, c. 127, s. 1; Code, s. 3449; Rev., s. 5410; C.S., s. 7758; 1925, c. 163; 1931, c. 145, s. 35; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1943, c. 605, s. 1; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1985, c. 226, s. 10(1); 1997-261, s. 106; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnnn).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnnn), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the 1943 amendment, see 21 N.C.L. Rev. 333 (1943).

§ 148-66.
Cities and towns and Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may contract for prison labor. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The corporate authorities of any city or town may contract in writing with the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction for the employment of convicts upon the highways or streets of such city or town, and such contracts when so exercised shall be valid and enforceable against such city or town, and the Attorney General may prosecute an action in the Superior Court of Wake County in the name of the State for their enforcement.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is hereby authorized and empowered to contract, in writing, with the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction for the employment and use of convicts under its supervision to be worked on the State test farms and/or State experimental stations.

History.

1881, c. 127, s. 1; Code, s. 3449; Rev., s. 5410; C.S., s. 7758; 1925, c. 163; 1931, c. 145, s. 35; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1943, c. 605, s. 1; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1985, c. 226, s. 10(1); 1997-261, s. 106; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnnn); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnnn), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the 1943 amendment, see 21 N.C.L. Rev. 333 (1943).

§ 148-67.
Hiring to cities and towns and State Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall in their discretion, upon application to them, hire to the corporate authorities of any city or town for the purposes specified in

G.S. 148-66

, such convicts as are mentally and physically capable of performing the work or labor contemplated and are not at the time of such application hired or otherwise engaged in labor under the direction of the Division; but the convicts so hired for services shall be fed, clothed and quartered while so employed by the Division.

Upon application to it, it shall be the duty of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, in its discretion, to hire to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for the purposes of working on the State test farms and/or State experimental stations, such convicts as may be mentally and physically capable of performing the work or labor contemplated; but the convicts so hired for services under this paragraph shall be fed, clothed and quartered while so employed by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

History.

1881, c. 127, s. 2; Code, s. 3450; Rev., s. 5411; C.S., s. 7759; 1925, c. 163; 1931, c. 145, s. 35; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1943, c. 605, s. 2; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1985, c. 226, s. 10(2); 1997-261, s. 107; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(oooooooo).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(oooooooo), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-67.
Hiring to cities and towns and State Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall in their discretion, upon application to them, hire to the corporate authorities of any city or town for the purposes specified in

G.S. 148-66

, such convicts as are mentally and physically capable of performing the work or labor contemplated and are not at the time of such application hired or otherwise engaged in labor under the direction of the Division; but the convicts so hired for services shall be fed, clothed and quartered while so employed by the Division.

Upon application to it, it shall be the duty of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, in its discretion, to hire to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services for the purposes of working on the State test farms and/or State experimental stations, such convicts as may be mentally and physically capable of performing the work or labor contemplated; but the convicts so hired for services under this paragraph shall be fed, clothed and quartered while so employed by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

History.

1881, c. 127, s. 2; Code, s. 3450; Rev., s. 5411; C.S., s. 7759; 1925, c. 163; 1931, c. 145, s. 35; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1943, c. 605, s. 2; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1985, c. 226, s. 10(2); 1997-261, s. 107; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(oooooooo); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(oooooooo), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-68.
Payment of contract price; interest; enforcement of contracts.

The corporate authorities of any city or town so hiring convicts shall pay into the treasury of the State for the labor of any convict so hired such sum or sums of money at such time or times as may be agreed upon in the contract of hire; and if any such city or town fails to pay the State money due for such hiring, the same shall bear interest from the time it is due until paid at the rate of six percent (6%) per annum; and an action to recover the same may be instituted by the Attorney General in the name of the State in the courts of Wake County.

History.

1881, c. 127, s. 3; Code, s. 3451; Rev., s. 5412; C.S., s. 7760; 1925, c. 163; 1931, c. 145, s. 35.

§ 148-69.
Agents; levy of taxes; payment of costs and expenses.

The corporate authorities of any city or town so hiring convicts may appoint and remove at will all such necessary agents to superintend the construction or improvement of such highways and streets as they may deem proper, or to pay the costs and expenses incident to such hiring may levy taxes and raise money as in other respects.

History.

1881, c. 127, s. 4; Code, s. 3452; Rev., s. 5413; C. S., s. 7761; 1925, c. 163; 1931, c. 145, s. 35.

§ 148-70.
Management and care of inmates. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in all contracts for labor shall provide for feeding and clothing the inmates and shall maintain, control and guard the quarters in which the inmates live during the time of the contracts; and the Division shall provide for the guarding and working of such inmates under its sole supervision and control. The Division may make such contracts for the hire of the inmates confined in the State prison as may in its discretion be proper.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 2; 1919, c. 80, s. 1; C.S., s. 7762; 1925, c. 163; 1931, c. 145, s. 35; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1959, c. 170, s. 2; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1975, c. 730, s. 1; 1983, c. 717, s. 14; 1985, c. 118; c. 226, s. 11; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 902, s. 2; 2007-280, s. 4; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(pppppppp).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-280, s. 4, effective August 1, 2007, in the section heading, substituted a period for a semicolon following “inmates” and deleted “prison industries; disposition of products of inmate labor”; deleted the language beginning with “In accordance with the provisions of Article 11 of Chapter 66...” and ending with “...by the Governor pursuant to

G.S. 66-58(f)

” in the first undesignated paragraph; deleted the second, third, fourth, and fifth undesignated paragraphs, and deleted subdivisions (1) through (3) related to management and care of inmates and prison facilities.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(pppppppp), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” at the beginning of the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-70.
Management and care of inmates. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction in all contracts for labor shall provide for feeding and clothing the inmates and shall maintain, control and guard the quarters in which the inmates live during the time of the contracts; and the Division shall provide for the guarding and working of such inmates under its sole supervision and control. The Division may make such contracts for the hire of the inmates confined in the State prison as may in its discretion be proper.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 2; 1919, c. 80, s. 1; C.S., s. 7762; 1925, c. 163; 1931, c. 145, s. 35; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1959, c. 170, s. 2; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1975, c. 730, s. 1; 1983, c. 717, s. 14; 1985, c. 118; c. 226, s. 11; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 902, s. 2; 2007-280, s. 4; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2017-186, s. 2(pppppppp); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendment to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-280, s. 4, effective August 1, 2007, in the section heading, substituted a period for a semicolon following “inmates” and deleted “prison industries; disposition of products of inmate labor”; deleted the language beginning with “In accordance with the provisions of Article 11 of Chapter 66...” and ending with “...by the Governor pursuant to

G.S. 66-58(f)

” in the first undesignated paragraph; deleted the second, third, fourth, and fifth undesignated paragraphs, and deleted subdivisions (1) through (3) related to management and care of inmates and prison facilities.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(pppppppp), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” at the beginning of the first sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.